Utah statutes.
70A-9a-626.   Action in which deficiency or surplus is in issue.
(1)  In an action arising from a transaction, other than a consumer
transaction, in which the amount of a deficiency or surplus is in issue, the
following rules apply:
(a)  A secured party need not prove compliance with the provisions of this
part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance unless
the debtor or a secondary obligor places the secured party's compliance in
issue.
(b)  If the secured party's compliance is placed in issue, the secured party
has the burden of establishing that the collection, enforcement, disposition,
or acceptance was conducted in accordance with this part.
(c)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 70A-9a-628, if a secured party
fails to prove that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance
was conducted in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to
collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance, the liability of a debtor
or a secondary obligor for a deficiency is limited to an amount by which the
sum of the secured obligation, expenses, and attorney's fees exceeds the
greater of:
(i)  the proceeds of the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance;
or
(ii)  the amount of proceeds that would have been realized had the
noncomplying secured party proceeded in accordance with the provisions of this
part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance.
(d)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(c)(ii), the amount of proceeds that would
have been realized is equal to the sum of the secured obligation, expenses,
and attorney's fees unless the secured party proves that the amount is less
than that sum.
(e)  If a deficiency or surplus is calculated under Subsection 70A-9a-615(6),
the debtor or obligor has the burden of establishing that the amount of
proceeds of the disposition is significantly below the range of prices that a
complying disposition to a person other than the secured party, a person
related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor would have brought.
(2)  The limitation of the rules in Subsection (1) to transactions other than
consumer transactions is intended to leave to the court the determination of
the proper rules in consumer transactions.  The court may not infer from that
limitation the nature of the proper rule in consumer transactions and may
continue to apply established approaches.
